Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4115.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to regulate and license pawnbrokers that conduct business in this state; to provide for the disposition of allegedly misappropriated property in the possession of pawnbrokers; to provide remedies and prescribe penalties; to prescribe civil penalties; and to provide for the powers and duties of certain local governmental units and state agencies. Sec. 18. (1) Any Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), a person who shall violate any of the provisions of that violates this act, whether as owner, or as clerk, agent, servant, or employe, shall be employee, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof in any court of competent jurisdiction be fined not less than 25 dollars nor more than 100 dollars, or punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 10 days nor or more than 3 months, a fine of not less than $250.00 or more than $1,000.00, or by both. such fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court. (2) A person that violates section 9 by charging on any loan a rate of interest more than the rate prescribed in that section is subject to a civil fine of not more than $5,000.00. The prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to collect the fine. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No 4116 (request no. H01548'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.